example-english/english.foma
# Vowels
define V [a | e | i | o | u ];

read lexc english.lexc
define Lexicon;


define EDeletion e -> 0 || _ "^" [i n g | e d];
define KInsertion [..] -> k || V c _ "^" [e d|i n g];
define EInsertion [..] -> e || [s|z|x|c h|s h] _ "^" s;
define ConsonantDoubling g -> g g || V _ "^" i n g ;
define YReplacement y -> i e || _ "^" s ,, y -> i || _ "^" e d ;

define Exceptions [m a k e "+V" "+PastPart"]:[m a d e];

define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

regex Lexicon .o.
	 ConsonantDoubling .o.
	 EDeletion .o.
	 EInsertion .o.
	 YReplacement .o.
	 KInsertion .o.
	 Cleanup;
	 
regex [Exceptions .P. Lexicon]
	 
	 
